Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.590

Trauma-informed care supports.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5752-S.SL) ***

(1) Beginning July 1, 2022, the department shall provide supports to aid eligible providers in providing trauma-informed care. Trauma-informed care supports may be used by eligible providers for the following purposes:

(a) Additional compensation for individual staff who have an infant and early childhood mental health or other child development specialty credential;

(b) Trauma-informed professional development and training;

(c) The purchase of screening tools and assessment materials;

(d) Supportive services for children with complex needs that are offered as fee-for-service within local communities; or

(e) Other related expenses.

(2) The department must adopt rules to implement this section.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "eligible provider" means: (a) An employee or owner of a licensed or certified child care center or outdoor nature-based care accepting state subsidy; (b) an employee or owner of a licensed family home provider accepting state subsidy; (c) a contractor or provider of the early childhood education and assistance program or birth to three early childhood education and assistance program; (d) a license-exempt child care program; or (e) an early achievers coach.

[ 2021 c 199 s 304.]

NOTES:

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.